Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-472
Memory care endorsement; qualifications; rules and regulations; fee.

(1) The department shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations establishing qualifications for a memory care endorsement. The qualifications shall be specific to those necessary for residents with cognitive impairment or dementia and shall include, but not be limited to, staffing enhancements, staff training, dedicated memory care programming, cultural competencies, facility requirements, and security issues.

(2) The department shall award a memory care endorsement to an assisted-living facility licensed under the Health Care Facility Licensure Act upon application which provides proof of meeting the qualifications and payment of the required fee.

(3) The department shall set the fee at an amount to cover the costs of administering the endorsement.

Laws 2016, LB698, § 21.